ani_adjectives_lexicon.lexd
# -------------------------------------------------------------------------
# DO NOT EDIT! THIS FILE IS CREATED AUTOMATICALLY!
# -------------------------------------------------------------------------

LEXICON Adjective_class_internal(2)

себло:се :ло                                                # другой
жибулгу:жи :улгу                                            # все
себгулоссу:се :гулоссу                                      # никакой
себгулоссу:се :гулоссу                                      # никто
жибгу:жи :гу                                                # сам
аблъин:a :лъин                                              # похожий


LEXICON Adjective_class_prefix

беххула:еххула                                              # высокий
бечIедир:ечIедир                                            # черный
беххула:еххула                                              # длинный
бочо:очо                                                    # низкий (скорее о живых)
бохор:охор                                                  # старый
берцIцIом:ерцIцIом                                          # чистый
бечIуха:ечIуха                                              # большой
бочо:очо                                                    # короткий
бечIугу:ечIугу                                              # пустой
бекъуб:екъуб[b]                                             # густой
беъора:еъора                                                # тонкий
бекIкIуб:екIкIуб[b]                                         # горячий
бекъуб:екъуб[b]                                             # сухой
беххула:еххула                                              # долгий
бещийа:ещийа                                                # прочный
бокьусси:окьусси                                            # средний
бегулъий:егулъий                                            # пьяный
букьиб:укьиб[b]                                             # жаркий
бехудусси:ехудусси                                          # следующий


LEXICON Adjective_class_prefix_and_internal(2)

бехудибасси:ехуди :асси                                     # последний


LEXICON Adjective_class_prefix_i_u

биши:ши                                                     # толстый
бичIой:чIой                                                 # мертвый
битIонниб:тIонниб[b]                                        # мокрый
бицIцIиб:цIцIиб[b]                                          # полный
бичIоб:чIоб[b]                                              # испорченный
биши:ши                                                     # толстяк
бичIоссуб:чIоссуб[b]                                        # целый
битIи:тIи                                                   # прямой
битIи:тIи                                                   # правильный
битIи:тIи                                                   # прямой


LEXICON Adjective_class_suffix

зархуб:зарху                                                # холодный
биссиб:бисси                                                # ваш
шуб:шу                                                      # хороший
бокьараб:бокьара                                            # любой
цIцIвакуниб:цIцIвакуни                                      # блестящий


LEXICON Adjective_no_class
